North Carolina, session 2025, HB58.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Kittrell, being Chapter 136
of the Private Laws of 1885, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the officers of said town shall consist of a mayor, mayor and three
commissioners and a constable; commissioners, and the commissioners shall have power to
appoint a secretary and treasurer.clerk and finance officer. The mayor and three commissioners
shall be elected for four-year terms."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
elections held on or after that date.
SECTION 2.1.(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 35 of the 1957 Session Laws, as
amended by Chapter 838 of the 1959 Session Laws, Chapter 172 of the 1969 Session Laws,
Chapter 310 of the 1973 Session Laws, and Chapter 81 of the 1985 Session Laws, two members
of the Asheboro City Board of Education shall be elected in 2025 on a nonpartisan plurality basis
with the results determined in accordance with G.S. 163-292 to serve a one-year term.
SECTION 2.1.(b) This section does not affect the term of office of any member
elected in 2025 to the Asheboro City Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Asheboro City
Board of Education for a member elected in 2025 shall be filled by appointment of the remaining
members of the Asheboro City Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.
Each member of the Asheboro City Board of Education elected in 2025, or any member
appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2025, shall serve until a successor has been
elected and qualified.
SECTION 2.2.(a) Section 2 of Chapter 35 of the 1957 Session Laws, as amended
by Chapter 838 of the 1959 Session Laws, Chapter 172 of the 1969 Session Laws, Chapter 310
of the 1973 Session Laws, and Chapter 81 of the 1985 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2. (a) The Asheboro City Board of Education shall consist of 11 seven members
elected for six-year staggered four-year terms. Members shall be elected on a partisan basis. The
election shall be held at the same time as provided by general law for the municipal elections for
the City of Asheboro. At the election on November 6, 1973, four (4) members shall be elected
*H58-v-6*

for six-year terms. At the election on November 4, 1975, three (3) members shall be elected for
six-year terms and at the election on November 8, 1977, four (4) members shall be elected for
six-year terms. Thereafter, biennially there shall be elected members of the board to fill those
vacancies created by expiration of the terms of office. of the general election in each
even-numbered year as terms expire. Candidates for election to the Asheboro City Board of
Education shall be nominated at the same time and manner as county officers. Members shall
take office on the first Monday in December following their election. The terms of all present
members are extended until the first Monday in December following the election of their
successors, or Members shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified. The election
shall be held and conducted by the Randolph County Board of Elections under the same
applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter Chapters 115C and 163 of the General
Statutes which are applicable to the election of municipal officers in the City of
Asheboro.Statutes.
(b) Any vacancy occurring by reason of death, resignation or otherwise than by expiration
of the term of office, on the Asheboro City Board of Education shall be filled for the unexpired
term by the appointment made by the remaining members of the board of education.in accordance
with G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 2.2.(b) Sections 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of Chapter 35 of the 1957 Session
Laws, as amended by Chapter 838 of the 1959 Session Laws, Chapter 172 of the 1969 Session
Laws, and Chapter 81 of the 1985 Session Laws, are repealed.
SECTION 2.2.(c) The terms of office for the four members serving on the effective
date of this section whose terms of office are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one year,
and the terms of office for the three members serving on the effective date of this section whose
terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year. To maintain the staggering of terms,
members shall be elected as follows:
(1) In 2026, two members shall be elected to serve a four-year term.
(2) In 2028 and quadrennially thereafter, three members shall be elected to serve
a four-year term.
(3) In 2030 and quadrennially thereafter, four members shall be elected to serve
a four-year term.
SECTION 2.2.(d) Between the date of the 2028 general election and the first
Monday in December 2028, the Asheboro City Council shall appoint a registered voter residing
in the Asheboro City Board of Education School Administrative Unit district to serve on the
Asheboro City Board of Education to vote only in the case of a tie. The person so appointed shall
serve a term of office expiring the first Monday in December 2030. In the event of a vacancy in
the seat appointed under this subsection, the Asheboro City Council shall fill the vacancy for the
unexpired term.
SECTION 2.2.(e) G.S. 115C-37.1(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Asheboro City Board of Education, the Hickory
City Board of Education and the Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following
counties: Alleghany, Ashe, Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Catawba,
Cherokee, Clay, Craven, Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Lee,
Lincoln, Madison, McDowell, Mitchell, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Polk,
Rutherford, Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 2.2.(f) This section does not affect the term of office of any member
elected in 2021 or 2023 to the Asheboro City Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Asheboro
City Board of Education for a member elected in 2021 or 2023 shall be filled by appointment of
the remaining members of the Asheboro City Board of Education to serve the remainder of the
unexpired term. Each member of the Asheboro City Board of Education elected in 2021 or 2023,
or any member appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2021 or 2023, shall serve until
a successor has been elected and qualified.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-3 House Bill 58

SECTION 2.2.(g) This section becomes effective the first Monday in December of
2026, and elections in 2026 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 3.(a) Notwithstanding Chapter 281 of the 1987 Session Laws, the Anson
County Board of Commissioners shall consist of seven members elected from seven
single-member residency districts. One member shall be elected from each residency district. No
person shall be eligible to file for or be elected to the Anson County Board of Commissioners
unless the person is a qualified voter and resident of the district in which that candidate seeks to
be elected. All candidates for election shall be voted on by all eligible voters in the county.
Members shall take office and qualify on the first Monday in December of the year of election,
and the terms of their predecessors shall expire at that same time. Members shall serve until a
successor has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 3.(b) Until revised in accordance with G.S. 153A-22.1, the residency
districts required by this section shall be the districts used in the 2022 elections for the Anson
County Board of Commissioners.
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 153A-22.1(f), as enacted by Chapter 215 of the 1995 Session
Laws, and as rewritten by S.L. 1998-175, S.L. 2011-126, S.L. 2023-24, and S.L. 2023-30, reads
as rewritten:
"(f) This section applies to Henderson and Moore Johnston, Anson, Henderson, Johnston,
and Moore Counties only."
SECTION 3.(d) This section becomes effective the first Monday in December 2026,
and elections in 2026 and thereafter shall be conducted accordingly.
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 153A-27.1(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) This section shall apply only in the following counties: Alamance, Alexander,
Alleghany, Avery, Beaufort, Brunswick, Buncombe, Caldwell, Carteret, Caswell, Cherokee,
Clay, Cleveland, Cumberland, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Guilford, Harnett,
Haywood, Henderson, Hyde, Jackson, Lee, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, McDowell, Mecklenburg,
Moore, Onslow, Pender, Polk, Randolph, Rockingham, Rutherford, Sampson, Stanly, Stokes,
Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
vacancies filled on or after March 3, 2025. Any vacancy occurring on the Caswell County Board
of Commissioners on or after March 3, 2025, shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 153A-27.1.
SECTION 4.1. Chapter 707 of the 1963 Session Laws, as amended by S.L.
1973-306, 2002-66, 2004-203, and 2006-171, reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. The purposes of this Act, among others, are to provide an enabling Statute, in
addition to other Statutes which may be available for such purposes, for the merger of the
Laurinburg City School Administrative Unit and the Scotland County School Administrative
Unit.
"Sec. 2. The Laurinburg City Board of Education and the Scotland County Board of
Education, by majority vote of the full membership of each of said Boards, may jointly petition
the Scotland County Board of Commissioners for a county-wide election on the following
subjects:
(a) The merger of the Laurinburg City School Administrative Unit and the Scotland
County School Administrative Unit and their respective Boards of Education.
(b) The construction of a new consolidated high school to be established to serve the
students assigned to Gibson High School, Laurel Hill High School, Laurinburg High School, and
Wagram High School, and the issuance of bonds pursuant to the County Finance Act, as
amended, for construction of said consolidated high school and for other school purposes in an
amount to be determined by the Scotland County Board of Commissioners upon the
recommendation of the existing City and County Boards of Education.
(c) To require the Laurinburg-Scotland County Board of Education to request and the
Scotland County Board of Commissioners to appropriate annually from any local sources,
House Bill 58 Session Law 2025-3 Page 3

including both general and supplemental tax revenues, such funds as will provide, at a minimum,
current expense expenditures per student from local funds which shall be no less than the average
current expense expenditures per student from local funds throughout the State, as determined
by the latest certification of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(d) To authorize the County Commissioners to levy a county-wide supplemental school
tax not to exceed fifty cents (50¢) per one hundred dollar valuation.
"Sec. 3. Upon the receipt of such petition, it shall be the duty of the Scotland County Board
of Commissioners to call an election upon the foregoing subjects within sixty (60) days thereafter
and fix the date for the same. The provisions of this Act, relating to the merger of the Laurinburg
City School Administrative Unit and the Scotland County School Administrative Unit, shall be
contingent upon the approval, by a majority of the voters voting in a county-wide election, of all
the proposals as set out in subsections (a) through (d) of Section 2 of this Act. The said election
shall be conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of the General Statutes of North
Carolina.
"Sec. 4.(a) The Scotland County Board of Education shall be comprised of 8 members. Five
of the members shall be residents of the Stewartsville Township and 3 of the members shall be
residents of any of the remaining 3 townships in Scotland County at large.
(b) Beginning with a primary election to be held in 1974, 2 members who shall be
residents of the Stewartsville Township and 2 members, who shall be residents of the other 3
townships at large shall be elected to membership on the Scotland County Board of Education
for initial terms of 4 years to expire in 1978. Beginning with a primary election to be held in
1976, 3 members, who shall be residents of the Stewartsville Township, and 1 member, who shall
be a resident of any of the other 3 townships, shall be elected to membership on the said board
for initial terms of 4 years to expire in 1980. In 1978 when the initial terms of the first 4 members
expire and in the regular county-wide biennial election of that year and in each regular
county-wide biennial election thereafter, four members shall be elected for terms of four years
each.
(c) The initial election for the 4 year terms of the 2 Stewartsville Township members and
the 2 members at large shall be conducted according to the procedure set forth in subsections
(d)(1) and (2) which provide for the regular elections for these seats beginning in 1978 and the
initial election for the four-year terms of the other 3 Stewartsville Township members and the
other 1 member at large shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures set forth in
subsection (d)(3) and (4) which provides for regular elections for these seats on the board
beginning in 1980.
(d) The procedure for election of members to the Scotland County Board of Education
beginning in 1978 and every 2 years thereafter shall be as follows:
(1) At a primary election to be held in 1978 and every four years thereafter at the
same time as the primary for the nomination of county officers 2 persons who
shall reside within the Stewartsville Township and 2 persons who shall reside
within any one of the other 3 Scotland County Townships at large shall be
elected for terms of 4 years each.
(2) (a) The 2 candidates from Stewartsville Township receiving the largest
number of votes in the primary election shall be the nominees whose
names shall be placed upon the ballot at the general election and the 2
candidates at large from the other 3 Scotland County Townships who
shall receive the largest number of votes in the primary election shall
be the at large nominees whose names shall be placed upon the ballot
at the general election; provided however, that if 2 or fewer candidates
should file for nomination from the Stewartsville Township and if 2 or
fewer candidates should file for the nomination from the other 3
townships at large the names of such candidates shall be placed on the
Page 4 Session Law 2025-3 House Bill 58

ballot for the general election and there shall be no primary election
for the Stewartsville Township or for the 3 at large townships.
(b) If the number of candidates who file for nomination from the
Stewartsville Township is twice or fewer than the number of vacancies
from Stewartsville Township the names of such candidates shall be
placed on the ballot for the general election and there shall be no
primary election; provided further, that if the number of candidates
who file for nomination from the Stewartsville Township is more than
twice the number of vacancies from the Stewartsville Township there
shall be placed on the ballot at the general election the four (twice the
number of vacancies) candidates receiving the largest number of votes.
(c) If the number of candidates who file for nomination from the other 3
Scotland County Townships is twice or fewer than the number of
vacancies from the other 3 Scotland County Townships the names of
such candidates shall be placed on the ballot for the general election
and there shall be no primary election; provided further, that if the
number of candidates who file for nomination from the other 3
Scotland County Townships is more than twice the number of
vacancies from the other 3 Scotland County Townships there shall be
placed on the ballot at the general election the 4 (twice the number of
vacancies) candidates receiving the largest number of votes.
(3) At a primary election to be held in 1980 and every 4 years thereafter at the
same time as the primary for the nomination of county officers 3 persons who
shall reside within the Stewartville Township and 1 person who shall reside
within any 1 of the other 3 Scotland County Townships at large shall be
elected to membership on the Scotland County Board of Education for terms
of 4 years each.
(4) (a) The 3 candidates from Stewartsville Township receiving the largest
number of votes in the primary election and the 1 candidate from the
other 3 Scotland County Townships receiving the largest number of
votes in the primary election shall be the nominees whose names shall
be placed upon the ballot at the general election; provided however,
that if 3 or fewer candidates should file for nomination from the
Stewartsville Township or no more than 1 candidate should file for
nomination from the other 3 townships at large the names of such
candidates shall be placed on the ballot for the general election and
there shall be no primary election for the Stewartsville Township or
for Scotland County at large.
(b) If the number of candidates who file for nomination from the
Stewartsville Township is twice or fewer than the number of vacancies
from Stewartsville Township the names of such candidates shall be
placed on the ballot for the general election and there shall be no
primary election; provided further, that if the number of candidates
who file for nomination from the Stewartsville Township is more than
twice the number of vacancies from the Stewartsville Township there
shall be placed on the ballot at the general election the 6 (twice the
number of vacancies) candidates receiving the largest number of votes.
(c) If the number of candidates who file for nomination from the other 3
Scotland County Townships at large shall be twice or fewer than the
number of vacancies from the other 3 Scotland County Townships the
names of such candidates shall be placed on the ballot for the general
House Bill 58 Session Law 2025-3 Page 5

election and there shall be no primary election; provided further that if
the number of candidates who file for the nomination from the other 3
Scotland County Townships is more than twice the number of
vacancies from the other 3 Scotland County Townships there shall be
placed on the ballot at the general election the 2 (twice the number of
vacancies) candidates receiving the largest number of votes.
(e) Repealed by Section 6 of Session Law 2006-171.
(f) The Board of Education shall prepare a ballot for use in the primaries and general
elections which shall be separate from other ballots and on which shall be listed separately the
candidates from the Stewartsville Township and the candidates from the 3 other Scotland County
Townships at large. The names of the candidates shall be placed on a ballot separate from other
ballots, bearing no party designation, and no party affiliation need be indicated at the time of
filing. Except as herein provided, all primary elections and general elections shall be held,
conducted and supervised by the County Board of Elections under the laws and regulations
providing for the election of county officers.
(g) All candidates for membership on the Scotland County Board of Education shall file
a notice of such candidacy with the Board of Elections not later than 12:00 p.m. on the Monday
preceding the tenth Tuesday before the primary election is to be held and each candidate shall
pay a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) and in addition shall certify in writing whether he is filing
for the Stewartsville Township seat or the at-large seat, the township within which he resides and
that he is a bona fide resident thereof, said notice to be filed with the Scotland County Board of
Elections.
(h) All persons registered and qualified to vote in the general election shall be qualified
to vote in the primary. All qualified voters of Scotland County may vote in any primary or general
election held pursuant to this act and may vote for all candidates for the Board of Education
regardless of their residence in either the Stewartsville Township or the at-large townships.
(i) Any vacancies which may occur on the Scotland County Board of Education after the
election of the members of the Board in 1974 shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the
remaining members of the board for the unexpired term; provided that, if the seat which shall
become vacant is held by a resident of Stewartsville Township his successor shall likewise be a
resident of the Stewartsville Township and if the seat which shall become vacant is held by a
resident of the at-large townships his successor shall likewise be a resident of one of the at-large
townships.
(j) In the event no candidate is elected in the general election to fill any term which is
about to expire then and in that event the Scotland County Board of Education shall declare a
vacancy and such vacancy shall be filled in accordance with subsection (i).
"Sec. 5. The following provisions shall apply in the event of merger under the plan provided
for in this Act.
(a) The Consolidated Board shall be the County Board of Education in and for Scotland
County and shall have county-wide jurisdiction over the public school system in Scotland
County, including all municipalities located therein. The name of the Consolidated Board shall
be: Laurinburg-Scotland County Board of Education.The public school system of Scotland
County shall be known as and shall use the style of "Scotland County School System," and the
Board of Education shall be known as and shall use the style of "Scotland County Board of
Education."
(b) Repealed by Section 2 of Chapter 306 of the 1973 Session Laws.
(c) For the fiscal year beginning July 1 immediately following merging of the two Boards
of Education, if the Consolidated Board is not created in sufficient time to present its
supplemental tax budget and its capital outlay, debt service and current expense budgets within
the time prescribed by law for said fiscal year, then the members of the Scotland County Board
of Education and the members of the Laurinburg City Board of Education, acting jointly and by
Page 6 Session Law 2025-3 House Bill 58

a majority vote of all members present, shall determine the amount and contents of the
supplemental tax budget requested for the fiscal year beginning July 1 of that year, and shall give
the Scotland County Board of Commissioners due notice thereof in time to levy such taxes as
may be necessary to provide funds for said budget for that year, and the said two Boards of
Education, acting in like manner, shall prepare and submit to the said Board of Commissioners
the capital outlay, debt service, and current expense budgets for that fiscal year within the time
prescribed by law.
(d) Each year following the merging of the two Boards of Education, at the same time
the other school budgets are filed, the Laurinburg-Scotland County Board of Education shall file
a supplemental tax budget which, when added to the regular budget, shall provide, at a minimum,
current expense expenditures per student from local funds which are no less than the average
current expense expenditures per student from local funds throughout the State as determined by
the latest certification of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction. The said Board of
Commissioners shall approve the regular and supplemental tax budgets in the minimum amount
provided for above and may approve the regular and supplemental tax budgets in larger amounts,
and shall then provide the funds therefor from local funds.For fiscal year 2025-2026, the Scotland
County Board of Education shall submit to the Scotland County Board of Commissioners, at the
same time the other school budgets are filed, a budget request for operational and capital funding
in amounts that would provide an appropriate education to all students in Scotland County during
that fiscal year. In evaluating the request, the board of commissioners shall consider the
educational goals and policies of the State and the local board of education, the budgetary request
of the board of education, the financial resources of the county and the board of education, and
the fiscal policies of the board of county commissioners and the board of education. Based on
this evaluation, the board of commissioners shall determine, in its discretion, the amount of
county revenues, including any voted supplemental tax revenues, to be appropriated to the board
of education's local current expense fund and capital outlay fund for fiscal year 2025-2026.
Neither the board of education nor the board of commissioners may initiate a dispute resolution
process or file any legal action challenging the determination of funds to be appropriated by the
board of commissioners to the local current expense fund and capital outlay fund for fiscal year
2025-2026. Beginning with fiscal year 2026-2027 and each year thereafter, the preparation,
submission, and approval of a budget for the board of education shall be in accordance with
Article 31 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
(e) The Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education, as reorganized, shall
appoint a treasurer of all the school funds of the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County School
Administrative Unit. The treasurer so appointed shall continue to fill such position at the
discretion of the Board of Education. No person authorized to make the expenditures or draw
vouchers therefor, or to approve the same, shall act as treasurer of said funds. The treasurer shall
give bond for the faithful performance of his duties in such amount as the Board of Education
may prescribe, but, in no event, for less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). Except
as herein otherwise expressly provided, the treasurer shall perform duties prescribed by
applicable provisions of Chapter 115 of the General Statutes of North Carolina and shall be
subject to all of such provisions of said Act. All sums appropriated by said Board of
Commissioners for capital outlay, current expense and to supplement the current expense fund
from State and county allotments shall be paid over to the Treasurer of the Laurinburg-Scotland
Scotland County Board of Education at reasonable periods after the receipt of said funds by the
Treasurer of Scotland County; provided, however, that the said Board of Commissioners shall
hold and administer the proceeds of school bond sales in accordance with the procedure now
being followed in holding and administering the proceeds of such sales.
(f) In addition to the election of a chairman in accordance with the provisions of Chapter
115 of the General Statutes, the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education may
also select one of its members as vice-chairman who shall preside at all meetings of the Board in
House Bill 58 Session Law 2025-3 Page 7

the absence of the chairman, and whenever the Board shall have duly authorized the execution
of any contract, conveyance, or other instrument, the vice-chairman shall have the same authority
as the chairman to execute the same on behalf of the Board. In the event of absence or inability
of both the chairman and vice-chairman, the Board by resolution duly adopted and spread upon
the minutes of any meeting, may authorize any other member to execute any contract,
conveyance or instrument for and on behalf of the Board.
(g) The superintendent of schools shall be ex officio secretary of the Board as provided
by G. S. 115-36. The Board may elect an assistant secretary to serve at the pleasure of the Board.
The assistant secretary may be, but shall not be required to be, a member of the Board. Such
assistant secretary may perform the duties of the secretary of the Board when the secretary is
absent from any meeting or for any other reason is unable to perform his duties as secretary. The
assistant secretary shall have authority to attest all contracts, conveyances, and other instruments
which are required by law to be attested by the secretary. The secretary, or in his absence, the
assistant secretary, shall keep the minutes of all meetings of the Board and it shall be the duty of
such secretary or assistant secretary to furnish each member of the Board with a copy of the
minutes as soon after any meeting as may be reasonably practicable.
(h) In addition to the election of a superintendent of schools in the manner provided by
the general law, the Board may employ, upon recommendation of the superintendent, such
associate superintendents and assistant superintendents and such other administrative officers as
it may deem necessary and proper, fix their salaries' and prescribe their duties and powers. They
may be elected to serve at the pleasure of the Board or for such terms as may be fixed by the
Board, but the terms of any associate superintendents or assistant superintendents shall not
exceed the term for which the superintendent is employed. All principals, supervisory personnel,
and teachers shall be employed by the Board, upon recommendation of the superintendent. The
Board may delegate to the superintendent of schools or to one or more associate superintendents
or assistant superintendents or to other administrative officers, the authority to employ and
prescribe the duties of all other employees or classes of employees, including janitors and maids,
and to fix the compensation and the terms or periods for which they shall be employed, subject
to the approval of the Board of Education.
(i) A majority of the full membership of the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board
of Education shall constitute a quorum.
(j) The Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education may appoint an
advisory council for any school or for all the schools within the system. The purpose and function
of an advisory council shall be to serve in an advisory capacity to the Board on matters affecting
the school or schools for which it is appointed. The organization, terms, composition and
regulations for the operation of such advisory council shall be determined by the Board. Article
7 of Chapter 115 of the General Statutes (School Committees) shall not apply to Scotland County.
The Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County School Administrative Unit shall constitute one
school unit.
(k) Title to all property of the Laurinburg City Board of Education and the Scotland
County Board of Education, both real and personal, of every kind and description, shall be vested
in the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education as of the effective date of
consolidation. The Laurinburg City Board of Education and the Scotland County Board of
Education shall have full and ample authority to execute without consideration therefor or public
sale of the property involved, all such deeds and other instruments as may be deemed necessary
or proper to vest record title to any such property in the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County
Board of Education.
(l) All claims and demands of every kind which the Laurinburg City Board of Education
or the Scotland County Board of Education may have as of the effective date of consolidation
shall pass and be transferred to the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education
and the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education shall have the same power
Page 8 Session Law 2025-3 House Bill 58

and authority to enforce said claims and demands as the Laurinburg City Board of Education or
the Scotland County Board of Education would have had in the event of its continued existence.
Any obligations or liabilities of the Laurinburg City Board of Education or the Scotland County
Board of Education existing as of the effective date of consolidation, shall be and become the
obligations and liabilities of the Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland County Board of Education and
such obligations and liabilities may be enforced against said Laurinburg-Scotland Scotland
County Board of Education to the same extent that they might have been enforced against the
Laurinburg City Board of Education or the Scotland County Board of Education had the said
Boards continued in existence.
(m) As of the effective date of consolidation, all provisions of the Charter of the City of
Laurinburg relating to public schools shall be deemed and are hereby repealed.
"Sec. 6. The provisions of this Act shall prevail over any inconsistent provisions of Chapter
115 Chapter 115C of the General Statutes of North Carolina and other general or special Acts.
"Sec. 7. The provisions in the preceding Sections of this Act shall be contingent upon the
following:
(a) Approval of the following by a majority of the voters voting in said election:
(1) Merger under the plan as set forth in this Act;
(2) Construction of a new consolidated high school to be established to serve the
students assigned to Gibson High School, Laurel Hill High School,
Laurinburg High School, and Wagram High School, and the issuance of bonds
pursuant to the County Finance Act, as amended, for construction of said
consolidated high school and for other school purposes in an amount as
determined by the Scotland County Board of Commissioners upon the
recommendation of the existing City and County Boards of Education.
(3) Requiring the Laurinburg-Scotland County Board of Education to request and
the Scotland County Board of Commissioners to appropriate annually from
any local sources, including both general and supplemental tax revenues, such
funds as will provide, at a minimum, current expense expenditures per student
from local funds which are no less than the average current expense
expenditures per student from local funds throughout the State, as determined
by the latest certification of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(4) Authorizing the Scotland County Board of Commissioners to levy a
county-wide supplemental school tax not to exceed fifty cents (50¢) per one
hundred dollar valuation.
(b) Petition by the Laurinburg City Board of Education to the Scotland County Board of
Education and the State Board of Education for merger of the Laurinburg City Administrative
School Unit and the Scotland County Administrative School Unit under this Act and Section
115-74 of the General Statutes of North Carolina within ninety (90) days after the announcement
of a favorable vote in such election. Said petition shall specify the effective date of merger.
(c) Approval of said merger by the Scotland County Board of Education.
(d) Approval of said merger by the State Board of Education.
"Sec. 8. If an election under this Act fails to carry on the subjects in Section 7 (a) (1) through
(4), or if no petition for consolidation is made under Section 7 (b), or if such petition is made but
not approved as required under Section 7 (c) and (d) of this Act, another election may be called,
for a vote on the subjects as outlined in Section 7 (a) (1) through (4) at any time after expiration
of six (6) months following the date of the next preceding election called and held under this Act.
"Sec. 9. Nothing in this Act shall operate to repeal any special school tax now provided for
by law for the Laurinburg City School Administrative Unit or the Scotland County School
Administrative Unit unless a majority of the votes cast in said election authorizes the subjects in
Section 7 (a) (1) through (4) of this Act and until the merger of the units is effected.
House Bill 58 Session Law 2025-3 Page 9

"Sec. 9.1. For the 2002-2003 fiscal year only, current expense expenditures from local funds
for the Scotland County Schools shall be eight million seven hundred thousand dollars
($8,700,000) and said sum shall be appropriated by the Scotland County Board of Commissioners
from local funds, including both general and supplemental tax revenues, and not including fines
and forfeitures or restricted use sales taxes authorized by Article 40 or 42 of Chapter 105 of the
General Statutes.
"Sec. 9.2. Beginning with the 2003-2004 fiscal year, the base amount of funding for current
expense expenditures from local funds shall include the previous year's level of current expense
expenditures (for example, eight million seven hundred thousand dollars ($8,700,000) in
2002-2003), multiplied by one plus the average percentage change in local current expense
school expenditures for the two most recent available fiscal years for low-wealth counties in
North Carolina (all local expenditures shall include local current expense expenditures incurred
by charter schools within the appropriate districts), as determined by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction or that person's designee. The average percentage change shall be calculated by (i)
adding together for each of the two previous fiscal years the total current local expense
expenditures for all low-wealth counties, (ii) dividing each of those totals, respectively, by the
number of low-wealth counties receiving low-wealth funding in each year to obtain an average
low-wealth county local current expense expenditure for each year, and (iii) comparing the two
averages. The average percentage change shall equal the percent difference between the averages
for the two years. The resulting product shall then be multiplied by a ratio consisting of the
Average Daily Membership used to distribute State funding for the succeeding fiscal year as
provided by the Department of Public Instruction, divided by the Average Daily Membership
used to distribute funding for the current fiscal year, as determined by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, or that person's designee. The resulting product shall be the required level of
current expense funding to be appropriated by the Board of Commissioners from any local
sources, including both general and supplemental tax revenues, and not including fines and
forfeitures or restricted use sales taxes authorized by Article 40 or 42 of Chapter 105 of the
General Statutes.
"Sec. 9.3. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 9.1 and 9.2 of this act, the Scotland
County Board of Commissioners and the Scotland County Board of Education may, in
extraordinary economic circumstances, jointly set a level of current expense expenditures for a
fiscal year. This deviation from Sections 9.1 and 9.2 of this act shall be valid only if approved by
resolution of both boards.
"Sec. 10. The public school system of Scotland County shall be known as and shall use the
style of 'Scotland County School System' and the board of education shall be known as and shall
use the style of 'Scotland County Board of Education'.
"Sec. 11. This Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its ratification."
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 27th day of March, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Wyatt Gable
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Page 10 Session Law 2025-3 House Bill 58